South Dakota, session 2026, SB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-19B-4 be AMENDED:
22-19B-4. Any person who, by threat or violence, intentionally prevents another
person from performing any lawful act enjoined upon or recommended by the religion the
other person professes, is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

26.780.10 2 113
An Act to increase the penalty for preventing practice of religion.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 113
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 113 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB113 ENROLLED